New York, session 2025-2026, A10329.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraphs (xiv) and (xv) of paragraph (a) of subdivi- 2 sion 4 of section 1367-a of the racing, pari-mutuel wagering and breed- 3 ing law, as added by section 4 of part Y of chapter 59 of the laws of 4 2021, are amended and a new subparagraph (xvi) is added to read as 5 follows: 6 (xiv) maintain a publicly accessible internet page dedicated to 7 responsible play, a link to which must appear on the mobile sports 8 wagering operator's website and in any mobile application or electronic 9 platform on which a bettor may place wagers. The responsible play page 10 shall include: a statement of the mobile sports wagering operator's 11 policy and commitment to responsible gaming; information regarding, or 12 links to information regarding, the risks associated with gambling and 13 the potential signs of problem gaming; the availability of self-imposed 14 responsible gaming limits; a link to a problem gaming webpage maintained 15 by the office of addiction services and supports; and such other infor- 16 mation or statements as the commission may require by rule; [and] 17 (xv) submit annually a problem gaming plan that was approved by the 18 commission in consultation with the office of addiction services and 19 supports that includes: the objectives of and timetables for implement- 20 ing the plan; identification of the persons responsible for implementing 21 and maintaining the plan; procedures for identifying users with 22 suspected or known problem gaming behavior; procedures for providing 23 information to users concerning problem gaming identification and 24 resources; procedures to prevent gaming by minors and self-excluded 25 persons; and such other problem gaming information as the commission may 26 require by rule[.]; and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14472-02-6 A. 10329 2 1 (xvi) require each mobile sports wagering operator to provide to every 2 authorized sports bettor a monthly account activity statement, delivered 3 electronically through a push notification and made continuously acces- 4 sible through the bettor's account, which shall include, at a minimum: 5 (A) the total amount of funds deposited during the reporting period; 6 (B) the total amount wagered during such period; 7 (C) the total amount of winnings and losses during such period; 8 (D) the net gain or loss incurred by the authorized sports bettor; 9 (E) the total number of wagers placed; 10 (F) the total amount of time the authorized sports bettor was logged 11 into the mobile sports wagering platform; 12 (G) an itemized accounting of any promotional credits, bonuses, or 13 free wagers utilized; 14 (H) a prominent and clear disclosure of responsible gaming resources, 15 including information regarding the state's voluntary self-exclusion 16 program and problem gambling assistance services; and 17 (I) access to the authorized sports bettor's lifetime wagering histo- 18 ry. 19 Such statement shall be provided no later than fifteen days following 20 the end of each calendar month. The commission shall promulgate regu- 21 lations establishing standardized formatting, clarity requirements, and 22 any additional disclosures necessary to ensure such statements are read- 23 ily understandable to authorized sports bettors. 24 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 25 ing the date upon which it shall have become a law.